South Dakota, session 2026, SB160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 41-6:
An individual may not, for consideration, provide fishing guide services without
annually registering as a guide with the Department of Game, Fish and Parks.
An individual who provides fishing guide services without being registered is guilty
of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The provision of guide services to each individual client
constitutes a distinct and separate offense.
The registration requirement set forth in this section does not apply to an individual
providing guide services on a body of water that is:
(1) Located entirely within the boundaries of a single privately owned property or
multiple privately owned properties; and
(2) Not publicly accessible.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 41-6:
An individual seeking to register as a fishing guide shall annually submit an
application to the Department of Game, Fish and Parks. The department shall make the
application available on its website, and in printed form upon request.
To be eligible for registration as a fishing guide, an individual must:
(1) Be at least twenty-one eighteen years of age;
(2) Pay a registration fee in the amount of:
(a) Fifty dollars, if a resident of this state; or
(b) Two hundred fifty dollars, if a nonresident of this state; and
(3) Agree to submit a report to the department, as required in section 3 of this Act.
Any fee submitted for registration as a fishing guide, in accordance with this
section, is nonrefundable.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

160C 2 160
The department shall forward any fee collected for registration as a fishing guide
to the state treasurer for deposit into the department of game, fish and parks fund, and
shall use the amount proportionally to support fish restocking efforts in the bodies of water
from which fish were taken, as reported in accordance with section 3 of this Act.
Upon approval of an application and payment of the fee in accordance with this
section, the department shall provide the guide with digital proof of registration.
Registration as a fishing guide is valid through March thirty-first of each year.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 41-6:
Each registered fishing guide shall submit electronically to the department, at the
conclusion of each daily guided trip, a document showing:
(1) The date;
(2) The guide's name and registration number;
(3) The name and address of each individual participating in the guided trip;
(4) The body of water on which the guide services were provided; and
(5) The species and number of fish taken.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 41-6:
The Game, Fish and Parks Commission may, in accordance with chapter 1-26:
(1) Deny an application for registration as a fishing guide upon a determination that
the application contains a material misrepresentation of any required information;
or
(2) Suspend the registration of any fishing guide upon a determination that:
(a) The guide has, without cause, failed to provide the daily report required in
accordance with section 3 of this Act; or
(b) Has misrepresented information contained in the daily report.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.